Idaho, session 2025, H0251.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:


SECTION 1. There is hereby appropriated to the Public Schools Educa-
tional Support Program's Division of Teachers the following amounts to be
expended from the listed funds for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30,
2026:
FROM:
Public School Income Fund $1,348,220,700
Federal Grant Fund 11,000,000
TOTAL $1,359,220,700
SECTION 2. There is hereby appropriated to the Public Schools Educa-
tional Support Program's Division of Student Support the following amounts
to be expended to the designated programs from the listed funds for the pe-
riod July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026:
TOTAL
I. ADMINISTRATORS DIVISION:
FROM:
Public School Income
Fund $129,336,900
II. OPERATIONS DIVISION:
FROM:
Public School Income
Fund $1,175,112,500
III. CHILDREN'S PROGRAMS DIVISION:
FROM:
Public School Income
Fund $124,182,700
Federal Grant
Fund 240,147,800
TOTAL $364,330,500
DIVISION TOTAL $1,668,779,900
SECTION 3. There is hereby appropriated to the Public Schools Educa-
tional Support Program's Idaho Digital Learning Academy $22,232,400 to be
expended from the Public School Income Fund for the period July 1, 2025,
through June 30, 2026.


SECTION 4. There is hereby appropriated to the Public Schools Educa-
tional Support Program's Division of Facilities the following amounts to be
expended from the listed funds for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30,
2026:
FROM:
Public School Income Fund $12,003,400
School Districts Facilities Fund 182,978,700
TOTAL $194,982,100
SECTION 5. There is hereby appropriated to the Public Schools Educa-
tional Support Program's Division of Central Services $14,237,600 to be ex-
pended for operating expenditures from the Public School Income Fund for the
period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 6. There is hereby appropriated to the Public Schools Educa-
tional Support Program's Division of Educational Services for the Deaf and
the Blind the following amounts to be expended from the listed funds for the
period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026:
FROM:
Public School Income Fund $16,058,400
School for the Deaf and the Blind Endowment Fund 237,200
TOTAL $16,295,600
SECTION 7. Of the amounts appropriated in Sections 1 through 6 of
this act for the Public Schools Educational Support Program, the following
amounts shall be considered expended from the listed funds for the period
July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026:
FROM:
General Fund $2,760,570,100
School Districts Facilities Fund 182,978,700
Public Schools Other Income Fund 13,450,000
School for the Deaf and the Blind Endowment Fund 237,200
Cigarette, Tobacco and Lottery Income Taxes Fund 4,324,900
Public School Endowment Income Fund 63,039,600
Federal Grant Fund 251,147,800
TOTAL $3,275,748,300
SECTION 8. PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT - TEACHERS. Of the moneys appro-
priated in Section 1 of this act, $13,750,000 from the Public School Income
Fund shall be distributed for professional development that supports in-
structors and pupil service staff to increase student learning, mentoring,


and collaboration. Professional development efforts should be measurable,
provide the instructors and pupil service staff with a clear understanding
of their progress, be incorporated into their performance evaluations, and,
to the extent possible, be included in the school district or public charter
school continuous improvement plans required by Section 33-320, Idaho Code.
Funding shall be distributed by a formula prescribed by the State Department
of Education, and the State Department of Education shall track usage and
effectiveness of professional development efforts at the state and local
levels.
SECTION 9. INSTRUCTIONAL AND PUPIL SERVICE STAFF COMPENSATION. In ad-
dition to the distribution criteria set forth in Section 33-1004B(9)(f),
Idaho Code, an additional $6,359 shall be allocated to each cell for resi-
dential, professional, and advanced professional rungs. These funds must
be used for instructional and pupil service compensation. Funding shall
be distributed in combination with other career ladder allocations for the
period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026. School districts and public
charter schools shall report to the State Department of Education on the
allocation of these funds for instructional and pupil service compensation.
The State Department of Education shall provide a report to the Joint Fi-
nance-Appropriations Committee by January 5, 2026, on the allocations made
by school districts and public charter schools. The format of the report and
the contents therein shall be determined by the Legislative Services Office
Budget and Policy Analysis Division.
SECTION 10. DISCRETIONARY FUNDS. Notwithstanding any law to the con-
trary, for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026, it is estimated
that the appropriation of state funds to the Public Schools Educational
Support Program's Division of Operations as part of the Student Support
Division will result in total discretionary funds of $23,472 per support
unit that are to be used at the discretion of the school district or charter
school.
SECTION 11. HEALTH BENEFIT AND INSURANCE FUNDS. Notwithstanding any
law to the contrary, for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026, it
is estimated that the appropriation of state funds to the Public Schools
Educational Support Program's Division of Operations as part of the Stu-
dent Support Division will result in total health benefits or insurance and
health benefits-related funds of $21,902 per support unit to be used to off-
set the costs of health, vision, and dental benefits or insurance offered to
school employees. If the distribution provided for health, vision, and den-
tal benefits or insurance is in excess of the individual school district's
or charter school's actual costs, the excess funds may then be used at the
school district's or charter school's discretion. Further, the State De-
partment of Education shall work with the Legislative Services Office Budget
and Policy Analysis Division and the Division of Financial Management to
determine the information that the State Department of Education shall col-
lect on school districts' and charter schools' health, vision, and dental
benefits or insurance plan information and costs, including but not limited


to actual insurance premium costs, premium percentage increases, and health
insurance revenues and expenditures from all fund sources.
SECTION 12. CLASSROOM TECHNOLOGY. Of the moneys appropriated in Sec-
tion 2 of this act, $36,500,000 from the Public School Income Fund shall be
distributed for classroom technology, classroom technology infrastruc-
ture, wireless technology infrastructure, and learning management systems
that assist teachers and students in effective and efficient instruction or
learning. Funding shall be distributed based on a formula prescribed by the
State Department of Education. Moneys so distributed shall be used to imple-
ment and operate a learning management system of each school district's or
public charter school's choice. A learning management system shall include
integration with a school district's or public charter school's student
information system and shall administer, monitor, and document student and
classroom levels of learning. The State Department of Education shall ver-
ify that school districts and public charter schools are using funds to pur-
chase a learning management system that is compliant with these standards.
SECTION 13. EXEMPTIONS FROM PROGRAM TRANSFER LIMITATIONS. For the pe-
riod July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026, the State Department of Education
is hereby granted the authority to transfer appropriations among the Teach-
ers, Student Support, Facilities, and Idaho Digital Learning Academy divi-
sions of the Public Schools Educational Support Program, in any amount nec-
essary, to comply with the public school funding provisions of appropria-
tions and Idaho Code. Additionally, appropriations may be transferred from
the Division of Central Services to the other divisions of the Public Schools
Educational Support Program.
SECTION 14. CIGARETTE, TOBACCO, AND LOTTERY DISTRIBUTION. Notwith-
standing any provision of law to the contrary, of the moneys appropriated in
Section 2 of this act, up to $4,324,900 from available cigarette, tobacco,
and lottery income tax revenue funds accruing, appropriated, or distributed
to the Public School Income Fund pursuant to Sections 63-2506, 63-2552A,
and 63-3067, Idaho Code, for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026,
shall be distributed to school districts and charter schools through a com-
bination of a base amount of $2,000 plus a prorated amount based on the prior
year's average daily attendance. Such funds shall be used to develop and
implement school safety improvements and/or to facilitate and provide sub-
stance abuse prevention programs in the public school system.
SECTION 15. COURSEWORK. Of the moneys appropriated in Section 2 of this
act, $4,715,000 shall be distributed for coursework for students failing to
achieve proficiency on Idaho's standards-based achievement tests in dollar
amounts determined by the State Department of Education. The State Depart-
ment of Education shall report to the Joint Finance-Appropriations Commit-
tee and the Senate Education and House Education committees by no later than
January 5, 2026, on the uses of funds and effectiveness of the programs and
efforts.


SECTION 16. OPEN ENROLLMENT INFORMATION. The State Department of Edu-
cation shall withhold the November payment for any school district that is
not in compliance with the provisions of Section 33-1409, Idaho Code, until
such time as the school district becomes compliant.
SECTION 17. ENGLISH PROFICIENCY. Pursuant to Section 33-1617, Idaho
Code, of the moneys appropriated in Section 2 of this act, $4,820,000 shall
be distributed for support of students in English language learner programs
as follows:
(1) The State Department of Education shall distribute $4,370,000 to
school districts and charter schools pro rata based on the population of Eng-
lish language learners under criteria established by the department.
(2) The State Department of Education shall distribute $450,000 for a
competitive grant program to assist school districts and charter schools in
which English language learners are not reaching statewide accountability
interim targets or long-term goals, as defined by federal law. This amount
shall be distributed annually in three-year grant cycles, contingent on ap-
propriation and the ability of grantees to meet program objectives.
The State Department of Education shall develop the program elements
and objectives governing the use of these funds and include a program evalua-
tion component.
The purpose of these funds is to improve student English language skills
to allow for better access to the educational opportunities offered in pub-
lic schools. The State Department of Education shall report to the Joint Fi-
nance-Appropriations Committee and the Senate Education and House Education
committees by no later than January 5, 2026, on the program design, use of
funds, and program effectiveness.
SECTION 18. ADVANCED OPPORTUNITIES COURSES AND PROGRAM EVALUATION. The
State Department of Education shall compile information concerning the num-
ber of students enrolling in advanced opportunities courses according to the
provisions of Chapter 46, Title 33, Idaho Code, whether coursework is suc-
cessfully completed, and total expenditures for fiscal year 2025. As nearly
as practicable, the report shall contain information about enrollment of
this student population in postsecondary education. A report containing
such information shall be posted on the website of the State Department of
Education no later than January 5, 2026.
SECTION 19. PUBLIC SCHOOL INCOME FUND TRANSFER TO COMMISSION ON HIS-
PANIC AFFAIRS. There is hereby appropriated and the Office of the State Con-
troller shall transfer in accordance with Section 63-2552A(2), Idaho Code,
on July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as practicable, $80,000 from the Pub-
lic School Income Fund to the Commission on Hispanic Affairs Miscellaneous
Revenue Fund to be used for substance abuse prevention efforts in collabora-
tion with the State Department of Education.
SECTION 20. PUBLIC SCHOOL INCOME FUND TRANSFER TO THE IDAHO STATE PO-
LICE. There is hereby appropriated and the Office of the State Controller
shall transfer in accordance with Section 63-2552A(2), Idaho Code, on July
1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as practicable, $200,000 from the Public


School Income Fund to the Idaho State Police Miscellaneous Revenue Fund for
the purpose of increasing toxicology lab capacity in Forensic Services.
SECTION 21. DIGITAL CONTENT AND CURRICULA. Of the funds appropriated in
Section 2 of this act, $1,600,000 shall be distributed by the State Depart-
ment of Education to school districts and public charter schools to purchase
digital content and curricula of their choice. Funding will be distributed
subject to Section 33-4804(2), Idaho Code.
SECTION 22. IDAHO DIGITAL LEARNING ACADEMY. The Idaho Digital Learning
Academy (IDLA), created pursuant to Chapter 55, Title 33, Idaho Code, shall
utilize state-appropriated funds for the period July 1, 2025, through June
30, 2026, to achieve the following:
(1) Tuition charged by IDLA to Idaho school districts and charter
schools shall not exceed $75.00 per enrollment.
(2) Provide remedial coursework for students failing to achieve profi-
ciency in one or more areas of Idaho's standards-based tests.
(3) Pursuant to State Board of Education rule, IDAPA 08.02.03, provide
advanced opportunities, including access to dual credit courses, for stu-
dents.
The preceding list shall not be construed as excluding other instruc-
tion and training that may be provided by the Idaho Digital Learning Academy.
SECTION 23. PROGRAM SUPPORT. Of the moneys appropriated in Section
5 of this act, up to $2,459,100 from the Public School Income Fund shall
be expended for the support of literacy programs, intervention services
for non-Title I schools that fail to achieve proficiency on Idaho's stan-
dards-based achievement tests, math initiative programs and regional math
labs, and evaluation of the programs for students with non-English or lim-
ited-English proficiency. The State Department of Education shall report
to the Joint Finance-Appropriations Committee, the Senate Education Com-
mittee, and the House Education Committee by January 5, 2026, on the uses of
funds and effectiveness of the programs and efforts.
SECTION 24. STUDENT ASSESSMENTS. Of the moneys appropriated in Section
5 of this act, the State Department of Education may expend up to $2,258,500
for the development or administration of student assessments, including a
college entrance exam for grade 11 students, an exam for grade 10 students
that provides preparation for the college entrance exam, and end-of-course
exams for high school science subjects.
SECTION 25. PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT - CENTRAL SERVICES. Of the moneys
appropriated in Section 5 of this act, the State Department of Education may
expend up to $4,500,000 for professional development and teacher training
and to track usage and effectiveness of professional development efforts at
the state and local levels.
SECTION 26. CONTENT AND CURRICULUM. Of the moneys appropriated in
Section 5 of this act, $1,200,000 shall be expended for the purchase of
content and curriculum for adaptive math instruction, and $2,250,000 shall


be expended for research-based programs to assist with the instruction of
students with non-English or limited-English proficiency and for learning
loss.
SECTION 27. CONTENT AND CURRICULUM - TECHNOLOGY. Of the moneys appro-
priated in Section 5 of this act, an amount not to exceed $1,570,000 from
the Public School Income Fund may be expended by the State Department of Ed-
ucation to contract for services that provide technology education opportu-
nities and/or information technology certifications to students, including
faculty that prepare students for college, career, or the workplace. Fund-
ing shall be awarded for projects that include three or more of the following
components:
(1) Certification of skills and competencies;
(2) Professional development for teachers;
(3) Integration with curriculum standards;
(4) Online access to research-based content and curriculum; or
(5) Instructional software for classroom use.
The State Department of Education shall provide a report to the Joint
Finance-Appropriations Committee, the Senate Education Committee, and the
House Education Committee by January 5, 2026, regarding the number and type
of certificates earned by students and faculty.
SECTION 28. YEAR-END RECONCILIATION. If the moneys appropriated and
transferred to the Public School Income Fund and the moneys appropriated
from the General Fund in Section 5 of this act exceed the actual expenditures
for the specified purposes, the difference shall be included in the year-end
reconciliation used to calculate funding available to meet the requirements
of Section 33-1018, Idaho Code, notwithstanding any other provision of law
to the contrary. If the funding amounts specified in Section 24 of this act
are insufficient to meet the actual expenditures, the difference shall be
included in the year-end reconciliation used to calculate funding available
to meet the requirements of Section 33-1018, Idaho Code, notwithstanding any
other provision of law to the contrary.
SECTION 29. DEFINITIONS. (1) As used in Sections 8, 9, 12, and 21 of this
act, "distributed" means moneys that are transferred to school districts and
public charter schools, with no funds withheld for any other contract or ad-
ministrative costs;
(2) As used in Sections 14, 15, and 17 of this act, "distributed" means
moneys that are transferred to school districts, public charter schools, and
the Idaho Digital Learning Academy, with no funds withheld for any other con-
tract or administrative costs; and
(3) As used in Sections 23, 26, and 27 of this act, "expended" means mon-
eys that pay for the cost of contracts that provide services to school dis-
tricts, public charter schools, or students or that pay for the State Depart-
ment of Education's cost of administering the programs for which the moneys
are allocated.
SECTION 30. ACQUISITIONS. Consistent with the provisions of Chapter
92, Title 67, Idaho Code, and funding provided in Section 5 of this act, the


State Department of Education is encouraged to engage in open, competitive
acquisition processes. The State Department of Education shall provide a
report to the Joint Finance-Appropriations Committee by December 1, 2025, on
all contracts signed during fiscal year 2025 for property valued at more than
$25,000. The report shall include for each contract: (a) the amount; (b)
the duration; (c) the parties; (d) the subject; (e) whether the contract was
awarded as a result of an open, competitive acquisition process or as a sole
source or other noncompetitive procurement pursuant to Section 67-9221,
Idaho Code; and (f) the rationale for signing any sole source or other non-
competitive procurements.
SECTION 31. There is hereby appropriated and the Office of the State
Controller shall transfer $2,430,570,100 from the General Fund to the Public
School Income Fund on July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as practicable for
the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 32. CONDITIONS, LIMITATIONS, AND RESTRICTIONS. Appropriations
made pursuant to this act are subject to the conditions, limitations, and re-
strictions specified in this act.
SECTION 33. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.